zh-CN: 飞行员头盔通讯集成: 包含 ANR 耳机; 包含无源耳机（无 ANR）; 集成对讲机模块; 无通信装置; 航空通信预布线; 其他
it: Integrazione delle comunicazioni nel casco da pilota: Include cuffie ANR; Include cuffie passive (no ANR); Modulo interfono integrato; Nessuna predisposizione per le comunicazioni; Precablato per comunicazioni aeronautiche; Altro
pt-PT: Integração de comunicações em capacetes de piloto: Inclui auscultadores ANR; Inclui auscultadores passivos (sem ANR); Módulo de intercomunicador integrado; Sem provisão de comunicações; Pré-cablagem para comunicações de aviação; Outra
lt-LT: Piloto šalmo ryšio integracija: Pridedamos ANR ausinės; Pridedamos pasyvios ausinės (be ANR); Integruotas pasikalbėjimo modulis; Be ryšio įrangos; Paruošta aviacijos ryšiui; Kita
vi: Tích hợp hệ thống liên lạc mũ phi công: Gồm tai nghe ANR; Gồm tai nghe thụ động (không có ANR); Mô-đun liên lạc nội bộ tích hợp; Không hỗ trợ liên lạc; Nối dây sẵn cho liên lạc hàng không; Khác
ro-RO: Integrarea comunicațiilor pe casca pilotului: Include căști cu ANR; Include căști pasive (fără ANR); Modul interfon integrat; Fără dotări de comunicații; Precablaj pentru comunicații de aviație; Altele
pt-BR: Piloto capacete integração de comunicação: Inclui fone de ouvido ANR; Inclui fone de ouvido passivo (sem ANR); Módulo de intercomunicador integrado; Sem provisão de comunicação; Pré-cabeado para comunicação de aviação; Outros
fr: Intégration des communications au casque de pilote: Comprend un casque à RAB; Comprend un casque passif (sans RAB); Module d’interphone intégré; Sans dispositif de communication; Précâblé pour les communications aériennes; Autre
de: Integration der Kommunikationssysteme des Pilotenhelms: Inklusive ANR-Headset; Inklusive passivem Headset (kein ANR); Integriertes Intercom-Modul; Keine Kommunikationsvorrichtung; Vorverkabelt für Luftfahrtkommunikation; Andere
tr: Pilot kaskı iletişim entegrasyonu: ANR kulaklık içerir; Pasif kulaklık içerir (ANR yok); Entegre interkom modülü; İletişim yuvası yok; Havacılık iletişimi için önceden kablolanmış; Diğer
fi: Lentäjän kypärän viestintäjärjestelmän integrointi: Sisältää ANR-kuulokemikrofonin; Sisältää passiivisen kuulokemikrofonin (ei ANR); Integroitu sisäpuhelinmoduuli; Ei viestintävalmiutta; Esijohdotettu ilmailuviestintää varten; Muu
cs: Integrace komunikace s pilotní helmou: Zahrnuje sluchátka s ANR; Zahrnuje pasivní sluchátka (bez ANR); Integrovaný modul interkomu; Bez přípravy pro komunikaci; S přípravou na leteckou komunikaci; Ostatní
en: Pilot helmet communications integration: Includes ANR headset; Includes passive headset (no ANR); Integrated intercom module; No communications provision; Pre-wired for aviation comms; Other
bg-BG: Интеграция на комуникации в пилотска каска: Включва ANR слушалки; Включва пасивни слушалки (без ANR); Интегриран интерком модул; Без опция за комуникация; С предварително окабеляване за авиационни комуникации; Друго
pl: Integracja komunikacji kasku pilota: Zawiera zestaw słuchawkowy ANR; Zawiera pasywny zestaw słuchawkowy (bez ANR); Zintegrowany moduł interkomu; Brak przygotowania do łączności; Wstępnie okablowany pod łączność lotniczą; Inna
nl: Pilotenhelm communicatie-integratie: Inclusief ANR-headset; Inclusief passieve headset (geen ANR); Geïntegreerde intercommodule; Geen communicatievoorziening; Voorbereid voor luchtvaartcommunicatie; Overig
da: Integration af pilothjelms-kommunikation: Inkluderer ANR-headset; Inkluderer passivt headset (uden ANR); Integreret samtaleanlægsmodul; Ingen kommunikationsløsning; Klargjort til luftfartskommunikation; Andet
sk-SK: Integrácia komunikačných systémov do pilotnej prilby: Obsahuje náhlavnú súpravu ANR; Obsahuje pasívnu náhlavnú súpravu (bez ANR); Integrovaný modul interkomu; Bez prípravy na komunikáciu; Predpríprava na leteckú komunikáciu; Iné
hu: Pilótasisak kommunikációs rendszerrel való integrációja: ANR fejhallgatóval; Passzív fejhallgatóval (ANR nélkül); Beépített intercom modul; Nincs kommunikációs előkészítés; Légiközlekedési kommunikációra előkábelezett; Egyéb
zh-TW: 飛行員頭盔通訊整合: 包含 ANR 耳機; 包含被動式耳機 (無 ANR); 內建對講機模組; 無通訊設備; 預留航空通訊線路; 其他
th: การบูรณาการระบบสื่อสารในหมวกนักบิน: รวมชุดหูฟัง ANR; รวมชุดหูฟังแบบพาสซีฟ (ไม่มี ANR); โมดูลอินเตอร์คอมในตัว; ไม่รองรับการสื่อสาร; เดินสายล่วงหน้าสำหรับการสื่อสารการบิน; อื่นๆ
sv: Kommunikationsintegrering för pilothjälm: Inkluderar ANR-headset; Inkluderar passivt headset (ej ANR); Integrerad intercom-modul; Utan kommunikationsförberedelse; Förberedd för flygkommunikation; Övrigt
sl-SI: Integracija komunikacije letalske čelade: Vključuje slušalke ANR; Vključuje pasivne slušalke (brez ANR); Vgrajen modul domofona; Brez podpore za komunikacijo; Predhodno ožičeno za letalsko komunikacijo; Drugo
ko: 조종사 헬멧 통신 통합: ANR 헤드셋 포함; 패시브 헤드셋 포함(ANR 제외); 통합형 인터콤 모듈; 통신 기능 없음; 항공 통신용 사전 배선 적용; 기타
el: Ενσωμάτωση συστημάτων επικοινωνίας στο κράνος πιλότου: Περιλαμβάνει ακουστικά ANR; Περιλαμβάνει παθητικά ακουστικά (χωρίς ANR); Ενσωματωμένη μονάδα ενδοεπικοινωνίας; Καμία παροχή επικοινωνίας; Προεγκατάσταση καλωδίωσης για επικοινωνίες αεροπορίας; Άλλο
hr-HR: Integracija komunikacije s pilotskom kacigom: Uključuje slušalice s ANR-om; Uključuje pasivne slušalice (bez ANR-a); Integrirani modul za interkom; Bez priključka za komunikaciju; Predožičeno za zrakoplovne komunikacije; Ostalo
es: Integración de comunicaciones en el casco del piloto: Incluye auriculares ANR; Incluye auriculares pasivos (sin ANR); Módulo de intercomunicador integrado; Sin provisión de comunicaciones; Precableado para comunicaciones de aviación; Otra
nb: Pilothjelmens kommunikasjonsintegrasjon: Inkluderer ANR-hodetelefoner; Inkluderer passive hodetelefoner (ingen ANR); Integrert intercom-modul; Ingen kommunikasjonsløsning; Klargjort for luftfartskommunikasjon; Annet
ja: パイロットヘルメット通信統合: ANRヘッドセット内蔵; パッシブヘッドセット内蔵 (ANRなし); インターコムモジュール内蔵; 通信機能なし; 航空無線用配線済み; その他
ru: Интеграция связи шлема пилота: Включает гарнитуру ANR; Включает пассивную гарнитуру (без ANR); Встроенный модуль интеркома; Без поддержки связи; Предварительная проводка для авиационной связи; Другое